cs: Střih vrchního dílu: Krabicový střih; Vypasovaný; Volný; Muscle střih; Oversized; Klasický; Uvolněný střih; Slim; Tailored; Jiné
sv: Toppens passform: Boxy; Figursydd; Lös; Muscle fit; Oversized; Normal; Avslappnad; Slim; Skräddarsydd; Övrigt
en: Top fit: Boxy; Fitted; Loose; Muscle; Oversized; Regular; Relaxed; Slim; Tailored; Other
es: Ajuste del top: Cuadrado; Ajustado; Holgado; Muscle; Extragrande; Regular; Relajado; Slim; A medida; Otro
th: พอดีตัว: ทรงกล่อง; พอดีตัว; หลวม; ทรงมัสเซิล; โอเวอร์ไซส์; ทรงปกติ; ทรงรีแล็กซ์; ทรงสลิม; ทรงเทเลอร์; อื่นๆ
pl: Krój topu: Pudełkowy (boxy); Dopasowany; Luźny; Muscle (podkreślający mięśnie); Oversize; Regularny; Swobodny; Slim; Taliowany; Inny
sk-SK: Vrchný strih: Krabicový strih; Priliehavý; Voľný; Muscle; Oversize; Klasický (Regular); Ležérny (Relaxed); Úzky (Slim); Na mieru; Iné
pt-PT: Ajuste da parte de cima: Quadrado; Ajustado; Largo; Musculado; Oversize; Regular; Descontraído; Justo; À medida; Outro
ko: 상의 핏: 박시핏; 피티드핏; 루즈핏; 머슬핏; 오버핏; 레귤러핏; 릴랙스핏; 슬림핏; 테일러드핏; 기타
hr-HR: Gornji dio: Kutijasti kroj; Uski kroj; Široki kroj; Muscle fit; Predimenzionirani kroj; Regularni kroj; Opušteni kroj; Uzak kroj; Strukirani kroj; Ostalo
vi: Phù hợp nhất: Form vuông (Boxy); Vừa vặn (Fitted); Form rộng; Ôm cơ bắp (Muscle); Form rất rộng (Oversized); Form chuẩn (Regular); Form suông thoải mái (Relaxed); Ôm sát (Slim); Đo may; Khác
hu: Top fazonja: Szögletes; Karcsúsított; Bő; Izomkiemelő; Oversize; Normál; Laza; Szűkített; Szabott; Egyéb
ro-RO: Croială a topului: Boxy; Pe corp (fitted); Lejer; Muscle fit; Supradimensionat; Standard; Relaxat; Slim; Ajustat; Altele
pt-BR: Top caimento: Quadrado; Ajustado; Solto; Muscle; Oversized; Regular; Folgado; Slim; Alfaiataria; Outros
zh-TW: 上衣版型: 方正剪裁; 合身; 寬鬆; 肌肉剪裁; Oversize 寬鬆版; 標準; 休閒寬鬆; 修身; 剪裁合身; 其他
ru: Посадка топа: Квадратный; Приталенный; Свободный; Облегающий (muscle); Оверсайз; Стандартный; Расслабленный; Узкий; Индивидуальный пошив; Другое
ja: トップスのフィット: ボクシー; フィット; ルーズ; マッスル; オーバーサイズ; レギュラー; リラックス; スリム; テーラード; その他
nb: Topp-passform: Boksformet; Tettsittende; Løs; Muscle fit; Oversized; Regular; Avslappet; Slim fit; Skreddersydd; Annet
sl-SI: Prileganje zgornjega dela oblačila: Kvadratast kroj; Teliran; Ohlapen; Za poudarjanje mišic (muscle); Oversized; Standardni kroj; Sproščen kroj; Ozek kroj; Krojen po meri; Drugo
fr: Coupe du haut: Carré; Ajusté; Ample; Muscle; Oversize; Standard; Décontracté; Slim; Cintré; Autre
nl: Top pasvorm: Boxy; Fitted; Los; Muscle; Oversized; Regular; Relaxed; Slim; Tailored; Overige
de: Passform des Oberteils: Kastig; Figurbetont; Locker; Muscle Fit; Oversized; Normal; Relaxed; Slim; Maßgeschneidert; Sonstige
da: Pasform for overdel: Boxy; Tætsiddende; Løs; Muscle; Oversized; Almindelig; Afslappet; Slim; Skræddersyet; Andet
fi: Topin istuvuus: Laatikkomainen; Istuva; Väljä; Muscle; Ylisuuri; Normaali; Rento; Slim; Räätälöity; Muu
lt-LT: Viršutinės dalies kirpimas: Dėžutės formos; Prigludęs; Laisvas; Išryškinantis raumenis; Padidintas (oversized); Įprastas; Laisvesnis; Siauras; Pagal figūrą; Kita
el: Εφαρμογή μπλούζας: Τετραγωνισμένη γραμμή; Εφαρμοστή γραμμή; Φαρδιά γραμμή; Γραμμή muscle; Oversized; Κανονική γραμμή; Άνετη γραμμή; Στενή γραμμή; Tailored γραμμή; Άλλο
zh-CN: 上装版型: 方形剪裁; 合体; 宽松; 肌肉版型; 宽大版型; 标准版型; 休闲版型; 修身; 定制合身; 其他
it: Vestibilità del top: Boxy; Aderente; Ampio; Muscle; Oversize; Regolare; Comodo; Slim; Sartoriale; Altro
bg-BG: Прилягане в горната част: Квадратна; По тялото; Свободна; Muscle; Oversized; Стандартна; Широка; Слим; По мярка; Друго
tr: Üst giysi kalıbı: Kutu kesim; Bedene oturan; Bol; Muscle fit; Oversize; Normal kesim; Rahat kesim; Dar kesim; Özel dikim; Diğer